Utah statutes.
59-2-506.5.   Conservation easement rollback tax -- One-time in lieu fee
payment -- Computation -- Lien -- Interest -- Notice -- Procedure --
Collection -- Distribution.
(1) (a)  Notwithstanding Section 59-2-506 and subject to the requirements of
this section, land is not subject to the rollback tax under Section 59-2-506,
if:
(i)  the land becomes subject to a conservation easement created in accordance
with Title 57, Chapter 18, Land Conservation Easement Act;
(ii)  the creation of the conservation easement described in Subsection
(1)(a)(i) is considered to be a qualified conservation contribution for
federal purposes under Section 170(h), Internal Revenue Code;
(iii)  the land was assessed under this part in the tax year preceding the tax
year that the land does not meet the requirements of Section 59-2-503;
(iv)  after the creation of the conservation easement described in Subsection
(1)(a)(i), the land does not meet the requirements of Section 59-2-503; and
(v)  an owner of the land notifies the county assessor as provided in
Subsection (1)(b).
(b)  An owner of land described in Subsection (1)(a) shall notify the county
assessor that the land meets the requirements of Subsection (1)(a) within 30
days after the day on which the land does not meet the requirements of Section
59-2-503.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), if a conservation easement is
terminated in accordance with Section 57-18-5:
(i)  the land described in Subsection (1) is subject to a conservation
easement rollback tax imposed in accordance with this section; or
(ii)  if the land described in Subsection (1) is owned by a governmental
entity as defined in Section 59-2-511, the land is subject to a one-time in
lieu fee payment that is:
(A)  in an amount equal to the conservation easement rollback tax imposed in
accordance with this section; and
(B)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), paid, collected, and distributed
in the same manner as the conservation easement rollback tax imposed in
accordance with this section.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a)(ii)(B), a one-time in lieu fee payment
under Subsection (2)(a)(ii) is not a lien on the land described in Subsection
(2)(a)(ii).
(c) (i)  The conservation easement rollback tax is an amount equal to 20 times
the property tax imposed on the land for each year for the rollback period
described in Subsection (2)(c)(ii).
(ii)  For purposes of Subsection (2)(c)(i), the rollback period is a time
period that:
(A)  begins on the later of:
(I)  the date the land became subject to a conservation easement; or
(II)  five years preceding the day on which the county assessor mails the
notice required by Subsection (3)(a); and
(B)  ends the day on which the county assessor mails the notice required by
Subsection (3)(a).
(d)  An owner shall notify the county assessor that a conservation easement on
land described in Subsection (1) has been terminated in accordance with
Section 57-18-5 within 180 days after the day on which the conservation
easement is terminated.
(3) (a)  If land is subject to a conservation easement rollback tax under
Subsection (2), the county assessor shall mail to an owner of the land a
notice that:
(i)  the land is subject to a conservation easement rollback tax under this
section; and
(ii)  the conservation easement rollback tax is delinquent if the owner of the
land does not pay the tax within 30 days after the day on which the county
assessor mails the notice.
(b)  The conservation easement rollback tax is:
(i)  due and payable on the day the county assessor mails the notice required
by Subsection (3)(a);
(ii)  delinquent if an owner of the land that is subject to the conservation
easement rollback tax does not pay the conservation easement rollback tax
within 30 days after the day on which the county assessor mails the notice
required by Subsection (3)(a); and
(iii)  subject to the same:
(A)  interest provisions of Subsection 59-2-506(7) that apply to the rollback
tax; and
(B)  notice requirements of Subsection 59-2-506(7) that apply to the rollback
tax.
(c) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(c)(ii), the conservation
easement rollback tax shall be paid, collected, subject to a lien, and
distributed in a manner consistent with this section and Section 59-2-506.
(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(c)(i), a lien under Subsection (3)(c)(i)
relates back to the day on which the conservation easement was terminated.
(4) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2), land described in Subsection (2) is
not subject to the conservation easement rollback tax or the one-time in lieu
fee payment required by Subsection (2) if after the conservation easement is
terminated in accordance with Section 57-18-5:
(i)  an owner of the land applies for assessment of the land as land in
agricultural use under this part within 30 days after the day on which the
conservation easement is terminated; and
(ii)  the application for assessment of the land described in Subsection
(4)(a)(i) is approved within two years after the day on which the application
was filed.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), if the land described in Subsection
(4)(a)(i) does not receive approval for assessment as land in agricultural use
under this part within two years after the day on which the application was
filed under Subsection (4)(a), an owner of the land shall:
(i)  within 30 days after the day on which the two-year period expires, notify
the county assessor that the two-year period expired; and
(ii)  pay the conservation easement rollback tax or the one-time in lieu fee
payment required by Subsection (2) as provided in this section.
(5)  Land subject to a conservation easement created in accordance with Title
57, Chapter 18, Land Conservation Easement Act, is not subject to a
conservation easement rollback tax or a one-time in lieu fee payment if the
land is assessed under this part in accordance with Section 59-2-505.
